Washington statutes.
RCW 36.79.150

Allocation of funds to rural arterial projects—Subsequent application for increased allocation—Withholding of funds for noncompliance.

(1) Whenever the board approves a rural arterial project it shall determine the amount of rural arterial trust account funds to be allocated for such project. The allocation shall be based upon information contained in the six-year plan submitted by the county seeking approval of the project and upon such further investigation as the board deems necessary. The board shall adopt reasonable rules pursuant to which rural arterial trust account funds allocated to a project may be increased upon a subsequent application of the county constructing the project. The rules adopted by the board shall take into account, but shall not be limited to, the following factors: (a) The financial effect of increasing the original allocation for the project upon other rural arterial projects either approved or requested; (b) whether the project for which an additional allocation is requested can be reduced in scope while retaining a usable segment; (c) whether the original cost of the project shown in the applicant's six-year program was based upon reasonable engineering estimates; and (d) whether the requested additional allocation is to pay for an expansion in the scope of work originally approved.

(2) The board shall not allocate funds, nor make payments under RCW 36.79.160, to any county or city identified by the governor under RCW 36.70A.340.

[ 1991 sp.s. c 32 s 31; 1983 1st ex.s. c 49 s 15.]

NOTES:

Section headings not law—1991 sp.s. c 32: See RCW 36.70A.902.